Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1722
Parking authority; records; audit; expense.

The authority shall keep a full set of books and records showing all of its transactions according to the best business practices. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall cause the books of the account to be examined and audited annually by a certified public accountant under direction of the Auditor of Public Accounts. The reports of all audits made by the Auditor of Public Accounts shall be made and remain a part of the public records in such office. The expense of such audits shall be paid out of the funds of the authority. The auditor shall be given access to all books, papers, contracts, documents, and memoranda of every kind and character and be furnished all additional information that may be essential to the making of a comprehensive and correct audit.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 22, p. 112;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 305.
July 21, 2022